Utah statutes.
51-7-18.3.   Certified dealers' list -- Fees.

(1) (a)  The council shall provide a list of certified dealers to each public treasurer at least semiannually.

(b)  The list of certified dealers shall include:

(i)  the name of each certified dealer; and

(ii)  the name of each agent authorized by the certified dealer to conduct investment transactions with the public treasurers.

(2)  In addition to the requirements set forth by rule, in order to become a certified dealer as defined in Section 51-7-3, a dealer shall pay to the director an annual certification fee of $500 due on or before April 30 of each year.



Amended by Chapter 248, 2004 General Session

